Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 4 Arkansas Water and Air Pollution Control Act
Subchapter 2
— Water Pollution

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1961, No. 120, § 8, which amended Acts 1949, No. 472, § 10, provided, in part, that it was the purpose of the act to provide additional and cumulative remedies to prevent, abate, and control the pollution of the waters of the state and that nothing contained in the act should be construed to abridge or alter rights of action or remedies in equity or under the common law or statutory law, criminal or civil, nor should any provision of the act, or any action done by virtue of the act, be construed as estopping the state, or any municipality or person, as riparian owners or otherwise, in the exercise of their rights in equity or under the common law or statutory law, to suppress nuisances or to abate pollution.

Acts 1965, No. 183, § 6, provided that Acts 1949, No. 472, §§ 1-12 (subchapters 1 and 2 of this chapter) were designated as comprising “Part 1, Water Pollution.”

Acts 1973, No. 262, § 1, provided that it was the purpose of this act to amend the Arkansas Water and Air Pollution Control Act (§ 8-4-101 et seq.) in such manner as to qualify and provide required legal authority to the State of Arkansas, through the Department of Pollution Control and Ecology for participation in the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System as provided by the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972, adopted October 18, 1972 (codified primarily as 33 U.S.C. 1251 et seq.), and to continue in effect the state permit program for the prevention and elimination of pollution of all waters of the state, including navigable waters.

In Acts 1975, No. 743, § 1, the General Assembly found and declared that since the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended (33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq.), provides for a permit system (National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System) to regulate the discharge of pollutants to the waters of the United States and provides that permits may be issued by states which are authorized to implement the provisions of that act, it was in the interest of the people of the State of Arkansas to amend the Arkansas Water and Air Pollution Control Act, as amended (§§ 8-4-101 — 8-4-106, 8-4-201 — 8-4-229, 8-4-301 — 8-4-314), in a manner so as to provide required legal authority to the State of Arkansas, through the Department of Pollution Control and Ecology, to implement the provisions of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended, and thereby to continue in effect the state permit program for the prevention and elimination of pollution of all waters of the state, including navigable waters.

Acts 1997, No. 1219, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent. With Act 1230 of 1991, the General Assembly sought to delineate the respective responsibilities of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission and the Arkansas Department of Pollution Control & Ecology. Confusion on these issues in the public’s perception continues, however, primarily because of the similarity in the names of these entities. The purpose of this Act is to achieve the legislative intent of Act 1230 of 1991 and to definitively assign the executive, adjudicatory, and rulemaking roles for the State’s regulatory functions concerning protection of the environment.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1961, No. 120, § 9: Feb. 21, 1961. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, operating experience under Act 472 of 1949 has revealed ambiguous and inadequate provisions which the foregoing amendments will eliminate and correct, and whereas a continuation of said ambiguous and inadequate provisions would be inimical to the proper control and abatement of water pollution and to the public peace, health, and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be in full force and effect from the date of its approval.”

Acts 1965, No. 183, § 8: Mar. 10, 1965. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the pollution of the air resources of the State of Arkansas by air contaminants can create serious hazards to the public health and welfare of the people; and, whereas, it is the public policy of the state to maintain such a reasonable degree of purity of the air to the end that the least possible injury shall be done to human, plant or animal life or to property, and to maintain public enjoyment of the state's natural resources, consistent with the economic and industrial well-being of the state; and, whereas, existing laws to prevent, control, and abate air pollution are inadequate to protect the health and general welfare of the people; now, therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be in full force and effect from the date of its approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 262, § 13: Mar. 9, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It being found that the existing state laws relating to water pollution control do not contain adequate legal authority for the state to continue to administer its own permit program for discharges into navigable waters within the state in lieu of that of the Federal Environmental Protection Agency and it being desirable that such authority be provided, an emergency is, therefore, declared hereby to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 743, § 11: Apr. 3, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It being found that the existing state laws relating to water pollution control do not contain adequate legal authority for the state to continue to administer its own permit program for discharges into navigable waters within the state in lieu of that of the Federal Environmental Protection Agency and it being desirable that such authority be provided, an emergency is, therefore, declared hereby to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 943, § 6: Apr. 5, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that, in order to avoid the needless disruption of business in this state, the director of the Department of Pollution Control and Ecology should be given authority to grant temporary variances and interim authority to construct or operate regulated activities. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2009, No. 369, § 2: Mar. 10, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that establishing financial assurance requirements for the closure of commercial facilities that engage in land application or storage of fluids generated or utilized during exploration or production phases of oil or gas operations is necessary to protect human health and the environment and that a delay in the effective date of this Act may result in harm to human health or the environment. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage or approval. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 954, § 3. Emergency clause failed to pass. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that clarification of the methodology for developing, implementing, and assessing state water quality standards for minerals and the procedure for identifying and protecting the use of domestic water supplies is needed to avoid unnecessary regulation and the inefficient use and allocation of scarce resources; and that this act is immediately necessary to ensure that existing regulatory requirements provide demonstrable benefits at reasonable costs and available resources are wisely allocated. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 4, § 2: Oct. 21, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that in response to the General Assembly's adoption of Act 954 of 2013, the United States Environmental Protection Agency has taken adverse action with respect to the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality's ability to issue permits under the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System Program; and that an immediate repeal of Act 954 of 2013 is necessary to alleviate such adverse action by the agency. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-4-201. Powers and duties of division and commission generally.

The Division of Environmental Quality or its successor is given and charged with the following powers and duties:

Enforcement of Laws. To administer and enforce all laws and regulations relating to the pollution of any waters of the state;

Investigations and Surveys.

To investigate the extent, character, and effect of the pollution of the waters of this state; and

To conduct investigations, research, surveys, and studies and gather data and information necessary or desirable in the administration or enforcement of pollution laws;

Program. To prepare a comprehensive program for the elimination or reduction of the pollution of the waters of this state, including application for and delegation of federal regulatory programs; and

Plans of Disposal Systems. To require to be submitted and to approve plans and specifications for disposal systems, or any part of them, and to inspect the construction thereof for compliance with the approved plans thereof.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission is given and charged with the following powers and duties:

Promulgation of rules, including water quality standards and the classification of the waters of the state and moratoriums or suspensions of the processing of types or categories of permits, implementing the substantive statutes charged to the division for administration.

In promulgation of such rules, prior to the submittal to public comment and review of any rule or change to any rule that is more stringent than federal requirements, the commission shall duly consider the economic impact and the environmental benefit of such rule on the people of the State of Arkansas, including those entities that will be subject to the rule.

The commission shall promptly initiate rulemaking proceedings to further implement the analysis required under subdivision (b)(1)(B) of this section.

The extent of the analysis required under subdivision (b)(1)(B) of this section shall be defined in the commission's rulemaking required under subdivision (b)(1)(C) of this section. It will include a written report that shall be available for public review along with the proposed rule in the public comment period.

Upon completion of the public comment period, the commission shall compile a rulemaking record or response to comments demonstrating a reasoned evaluation of the relative impact and benefits of the more stringent regulation;

Promulgation of rules and procedures not otherwise governed by applicable law that the commission deems necessary to secure public participation in environmental decision-making processes;

Promulgation of rules governing administrative procedures for challenging or contesting division actions;

In the case of permitting or grants decisions, provide the right to appeal a permitting or grants decision rendered by the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality or his or her delegatee;

In the case of an administrative enforcement or emergency action, provide the right to contest any such action initiated by the director;

Instruct the director to prepare such reports or perform such studies or investigations as will advance the cause of environmental protection in the state;

Make recommendations to the director regarding overall policy and administration of the division, provided, however, that the director shall always remain within the plenary authority of the Governor and the Secretary of the Department of Energy and Environment; and

Upon a majority vote, initiate review of any director's decision.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 1], § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1904; Acts 1993, No. 163, § 11; 1993, No. 165, § 11; 1997, No. 1219, § 5; 1999, No. 1164, § 19; 2019, No. 315, §§ 457, 458; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2480-2483.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b)(1)(A), and made similar changes throughout the section.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language of (a) and in (b)(4); substituted “division” for “department” in (b)(1)(A), (b)(3), and (b)(7); and inserted “and the Secretary of the Department of Energy and Environment” in (b)(7).

8-4-202. Rules.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission is given and charged with the power and duty to adopt, modify, or repeal, after notice and public hearings, rules implementing or effectuating the powers and duties of the Division of Environmental Quality and the commission under this chapter.

Without limiting the generality of this authority, these rules may, among other things, prescribe:

Effluent standards specifying the maximum amounts or concentrations and the physical, thermal, chemical, biological, and radioactive nature of the contaminants that may be discharged into the waters of this state or into publicly owned treatment facilities;

Requirements and standards for equipment and procedures for monitoring contaminant discharges at their sources, including publicly owned treatment facilities and industrial discharges into such facilities, the collection of samples, and the collection, reporting, and retention of data resulting from such monitoring; and

Water quality standards, performance standards, and pretreatment standards.

Any person shall have the right to petition the commission for the issuance, amendment, or repeal of any rule. Within sixty (60) days from the date of the submission of a petition, the commission shall either institute rulemaking proceedings or give the petitioner written notice denying the petition, together with a written statement setting out the reasons for denial.

In the event the petition is denied, the decision of the commission will be deemed a final order subject to appeal as provided in subdivision (d)(5) of this section.

The record for appeal in a petition denial shall consist of the petition for rulemaking filed with the commission, the commission's written statement setting out the reasons for denial, and any document referenced therein.

Before the adoption, amendment, or repeal of any rule or before suspending the processing of a type or category of permits or the declaration of a moratorium on a type or category of permits, the commission shall give at least thirty (30) days' notice of its intended action.

The notice shall include:

A statement of the substance of the intended action;

A description of the subjects and issues involved; and

The time, place, and manner in which interested persons may make comments.

The notice shall be mailed or emailed to all persons who have requested advance notice of rulemaking proceedings.

The notice shall also be published at least two (2) times in newspapers having a general statewide circulation and in the appropriate industry, trade, or professional publications the commission may select.

All interested parties shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to:

Submit written data, information, views, opinions, and arguments; and

Make oral statements concerning the proposed rule, suspension, or moratorium prior to a decision being rendered by the commission.

All written material, photographs, published material, and electronic media received by the commission shall be preserved and, along with a record of all oral comments made at any public hearing, shall become an element of the record of rulemaking.

Any person who considers himself or herself injured in his or her person, business, or property by final agency action under this section shall be entitled to judicial review of the action under this section.

If, in response to comments, the commission amends a proposed rule to the extent that the rule would have an effect not previously expressed in the notice required by subdivision (d)(1) of this section, the commission shall provide another adequate public notice.

Subdivision (d)(3)(A) of this section shall not, however, require a second public notice if the final rule is a logical outgrowth of the rule proposed in the prior notice.

The commission shall compile and maintain a record of rule-making that shall contain:

A copy of all notices described in this subsection and a concise general statement of the basis and purpose of the proposed rule, which shall include a written explanation of the necessity of the rule and a demonstration that any technical rule or technical standard is based on generally accepted scientific knowledge and engineering practices.

For any standard or rule that is identical to a regulation promulgated by the United States Environmental Protection Agency, this portion of the record may be satisfied by reference to the Code of Federal Regulations.

In all other cases, the division must provide its own justification with appropriate references to the scientific and engineering literature or written studies conducted by the division;

Copies of all written material, photographs, published materials, electronic media, and the record of all oral comments received by the commission during the public comment period and hearings; and

A responsive summary that groups public comments into similar categories and explains why the commission accepted or rejected the rationale of each category.

The decisions of the commission with regard to this section are final and may be judicially appealed to the appropriate circuit court as provided in § 8-4-222 within thirty (30) days after filing with the office of the Secretary of State by persons that have standing as set out in subdivision (d)(2) of this section.

The record for review shall consist of a copy of the rule and the record of rulemaking described in subdivision (d)(4) of this section.

Rule changes, suspensions, or moratoria on types of categories of permits adopted by the commission shall be stayed and not take effect during the pendency of the appeal, except as specified in subsection (e) of this section.

If the commission determines that imminent peril to the public health, safety, or welfare requires immediate change in the rules or immediate suspension or moratorium on categories or types of permits, it may, after documenting the facts and reasons, declare an emergency and implement emergency rules, suspensions, or moratoria.

No rule, suspension, or moratorium adopted under an emergency declaration shall be effective for longer than one hundred eighty (180) days.

The imminent loss of federal funding, certification, or authorization for any program administered by the division shall establish a prima facie case of imminent peril to the public health, safety, or welfare.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 1], § 3; 1961, No. 120, § 5; 1973, No. 262, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1904; Acts 1993, No. 163, § 12; 1993, No. 165, § 12; 1997, No. 314, § 1; 1997, No. 1219, § 5; 2011, No. 195, § 1; 2013, No. 954, § 2; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 4, § 1; 2019, No. 315, §§ 459-466; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2484-2486.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2013, No. 954, § 1, provided: “Legislative findings and intent.

“(a)

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

Under current interpretations by the United States Environmental Protection Agency, the development, implementation, and assessment of water quality standards required under the Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq., are to be based on sound scientific and statistical principles, among other things, and should consider readily available data that is consistent with and relevant to the water use to be maintained;

“(2)

Federal law requires the consideration of certain relevant factors, including natural variability and statistical variability over periods of time that are relevant to the water use to be maintained;

“(3)

After consideration of readily available data, reliance on data that is not significant or meaningful, is incomplete, is not indicative of conditions relevant to the water use to be maintained, is speculative, is inconclusive or reasonably supportive of different conclusions, or is otherwise not well-suited to the purpose for which it is being used, has the potential to lead to unnecessary regulation and the inefficient use and allocation of scarce resources;

“(4)

The State of Arkansas has a well-developed and long-standing program of sampling the quality of waters subject to various uses;

“(5)

There is a rational basis found in sound scientific and statistical principles for using long-term averages in assessing mineral concentrations in a stream;

“(6)

The Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality's analysis of data from Arkansas streams demonstrates that four cubic feet per second (4 ft³/s) is the median flow for small streams, which makes this measure an appropriate indicator for stream flow when long-term flow data is not available, thereby avoiding unnecessary regulation and the inefficient use of state resources;

“(7)

It is appropriate and consistent with sound scientific and statistical principles to use the greater of long-term average flows or four cubic feet per second (4 ft³/s) for assessing mineral concentrations in streams; and

“(8)

Because of the existing technological and economic limits on treatability of dissolved minerals and the likely localized economic impacts of the treatability requirement, it is an inefficient use of scarce resources to apply domestic water supply uses and criteria to streams, stream segments, or other bodies of water that do not have an existing domestic water supply use or that do not have a demonstrated and reasonable potential to be used as a domestic water supply source.

“(b)

The intent of this act is to:

“(1)

Provide for the consideration of existing and readily available data and information relevant to the development, implementation, and assessment of water quality standards for minerals;

“(2)

Provide standards for determining the data that should be considered and relied on by the State of Arkansas and its agencies for the development, implementation, and assessment of water quality standards for minerals; and

“(3)

Direct state agencies to support the development, implementation, and assessment of water quality standards according to the provisions of this act.”

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment inserted “or emailed” in (d)(1)(C).

The 2013 amendment rewrote (b)(3).

The 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment rewrote (b)(3).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a) and (b); deleted “or regulation” following “rule” in (c)(1) and (d)(1)(A); deleted “regulation” following “rule” in (d)(2)(A)(ii) and (e)(2); substituted “rule” for “regulation” throughout (d)(3)-(5); and deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (e)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department”
in (d)(4)(A)(iii) twice and in (e)(3).